California, session 20252026, AB1804.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5011.3 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:5011.3. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) It is the policy of the state to ensure equitable and inclusive access to the state park system by empowering the department to administer programs that broaden public access to the state parks.(2) The state park system provides a host of important values to the residents of California, including recreational, cultural, environmental, and public health benefits.(3) The current fee structures to enter a unit of the state park system create financial barriers that limit access for many residents.(4) It is imperative that the department support comprehensive access to the state parks for all residents of California.(b) The department may work with the California State Library and individual library systems in order to provide park passes.